District of Columbia statutes.
2-302.07

Repealed

Transfer of procurement personnel to the Office of Contracting and Procurement.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 207, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(j), 44 DCR 1423
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-82, § 2(b), 45 DCR 772
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1182.7.